hr-HR: Postavi klasifikaciju: Prvenstvo; Za djecu / juniore; Rekreativno / za dvorište; Turnir; Za putovanja / kompaktno; Ostalo
hu: Készlet besorolása: Bajnokság; Gyermek / Junior; Szabadidős / Kerti; Verseny; Utazó / Kompakt; Egyéb
lt-LT: Rinkinio klasifikacija: Čempionato; Vaikų / jaunių; Pramoginis / kiemo; Turnyro; Kelioninis / kompaktiškas; Kita
fi: Pakkauksen luokitus: Mestaruustaso; Lapset/juniorit; Harraste/pihapeli; Turnaustaso; Matka/kompakti; Muu
it: Classificazione del set: Campionato; Bambini/Junior; Amatoriale/Da giardino; Torneo; Da viaggio/Compatto; Altro
el: Κατηγοριοποίηση σετ: Πρωταθλήματος; Παιδικό/junior; Αναψυχής/κήπου; Τουρνουά; Ταξιδιού/συμπαγές; Άλλο
sv: Setklassificering: Mästerskap; Barn/junior; Fritid/trädgård; Turnering; Rese/kompakt; Övrigt
tr: Sınıflandırma kümesi: Şampiyona; Çocuk/genç; Eğlence amaçlı/arka bahçe; Turnuva; Seyahat/kompakt; Diğer
en: Set classification: Championship; Kids/junior; Recreational/backyard; Tournament; Travel/compact; Other
pt-BR: Conjunto classificação: Campeonato; Infantil/júnior; Recreativo/quintal; Torneio; Viagem/compacto; Outra
fr: Classification du jeu: Championnat; Enfants/junior; Loisir/jardin; Tournoi; Voyage/compact; Autre
ru: Классификация набора: Для чемпионата; Детские/юношеские; Для отдыха/дачи; Турнирные; Дорожные/компактные; Другое
pl: Klasyfikacja zestawu: Mistrzowski; Dla dzieci / juniorów; Rekreacyjny / do ogrodu; Turniejowy; Podróżny / kompaktowy; Inne
nl: Set classificatie: Kampioenschap; Kinderen/junior; Recreatief/achtertuin; Toernooi; Reizen/compact; Overig
ko: 집합 분류: 챔피언십; 아동/주니어; 레크리에이션/야외용; 토너먼트; 여행용/소형; 기타
vi: Phân loại tập hợp: Giải vô địch; Trẻ em/thiếu niên; Giải trí/sân nhà; Giải đấu; Du lịch/nhỏ gọn; Khác
da: Sætklassificering: Mesterskab; Børn/junior; Fritid/baghave; Turnering; Rejse/kompakt; Andet
bg-BG: Класификация на комплекта: Шампионски; Детски/за юноши; Развлекателен/за двора; Турнирен; За пътуване/компактен; Друго
sl-SI: Klasifikacija kompleta: Prvenstveno; Otroško/mladinsko; Rekreacijsko/za dvorišče; Turnirsko; Potovalno/kompaktno; Drugo
cs: Klasifikace sady: Mistrovská; Dětská/juniorská; Rekreační/na zahradu; Turnajová; Cestovní/kompaktní; Jiné
ro-RO: Clasificarea setului: Campionat; Copii/juniori; Recreativ/curte; Turneu; Călătorie/compact; Altele
pt-PT: Classificação do conjunto: Campeonato; Crianças/júnior; Recreativo/jardim; Torneio; Viagem/compacto; Outro
th: การจำแนกประเภทชุด: ชิงแชมป์; เด็ก/เยาวชน; สันทนาการ/เล่นในบ้าน; ทัวร์นาเมนต์; พกพา/กะทัดรัด; อื่นๆ
nb: Settklassifisering: Mesterskap; Barn/junior; Fritid/hage; Turnering; Reise/kompakt; Annet
sk-SK: Klasifikácia sady: Majstrovské; Detské/juniorské; Rekreačné/záhradné; Turnajové; Cestovné/kompaktné; Iné
ja: セット分類: チャンピオンシップ; キッズ/ジュニア; レクリエーション/バックヤード; トーナメント; トラベル/コンパクト; その他
es: Clasificación del set: Campeonato; Niños/juvenil; Recreativo/patio; Torneo; Viaje/compacto; Otro
zh-TW: 套組分類: 冠軍賽級; 兒童/青少年; 休閒/後院; 錦標賽級; 旅行/輕巧; 其他
de: Setklassifizierung: Meisterschaft; Kinder/Junior; Freizeit/Garten; Turnier; Reise/Kompakt; Andere
zh-CN: 套装分类: 冠军级; 儿童/青少年; 娱乐/后院; 比赛级; 旅行/便携; 其他